California statutes. Education Code
(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 53, Sec. 24.   (SB 77)   Effective July 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4.6. Center for African-American Education Excellence and Achievement [89430. - 89436.]

89430.

The trustees may establish the Center for African-American Educational Excellence and Achievement. It is the intent of the Legislature that the center be located near the Compton and Watts areas of Los Angeles. Accordingly the center shall be established at California State University Dominguez Hills, the campus in closest proximity to these areas.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1277, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

89432.

(a) The purpose and mission of the center is to further the education of students and to develop pedagogical materials, procedures, and programs designed to increase the learning skills of African-Americans.

(b) The center may engage in research, training, and development relative to the promotion of educational excellence among African-Americans. In addition, the center may serve as a national repository of information on effective African-American teaching methodology.

(c) If the center is established, its research shall be concentrated in the following areas relating to African-Americans:

(1) Problems and issues which affect the failure or success of African-American students.

(2) The elements of an effective educational program.

(3) The impact of educational reform movements on African-American students and teachers.

(4) Development of strategies which facilitate and promote African-American achievement.

(5) Development of techniques that integrate culture into educational practice.

(6) Continual curriculum development and effective instructional strategies.

(7) The development and implementation of culturally sensitive teacher and staff training programs.

(8) The creation and implementation of parent-community-school coalitions for the purpose of facilitating teaching and learning.

(9) Intervention studies that address access and retention problems experienced by African-American students.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1277, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

89434.

(a) If the center is established the Chancellor of the California State University shall appoint an advisory board to the Center for African-American Educational Excellence and Achievement, which shall recommend goals, objectives, and priorities for the center.

(b) The members of the advisory board shall serve without compensation, but may be reimbursed for necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties in accordance with the regulations and guidelines of the California State University.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1277, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

89436.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the Center for African-American Educational Excellence and Achievement be funded by a variety of sources, including grants, contributions, and appropriations from federal, state, local, or private sources.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1277, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4.7. California State University Program for Education and Research in Biotechnology [89440. - 89440.]

89440.

(a) The Legislature hereby finds and declares all of the following:

(1) The biotechnology industry in California is a rapidly growing industry that will be a critical factor in the state’s economic success in the new millennium.

(2) The California State University plays a significant role in the production and maintenance of the workforce for this rapidly growing industry.

(3) The California State University Program for Education and Research in Biotechnology was created in 1987 to provide a coordinated and amplified development of biotechnology research and education within the California State University, to foster competitiveness in the industry on both the state and national levels, to facilitate training of a sufficient number of biotechnology technicians and scientists, to catalyze technology transfer and enhance intellectual property protection, and to facilitate the acquisition and long-term maintenance of state-of-the-art biotechnology resource facilities.

(4) The program facilitates interdisciplinary cooperative activities between the biology and chemistry departments on all California State University campuses and between faculty and a number of allied academic and research units, including bioengineering, agricultural biotechnology, environmental and natural resources, molecular ecology, and marine biotechnology.

(5) The program conducts a number of activities, including a competitive applied research and education grants program, the upgrade of biotechnology instructional and research equipment, the development of specialized training facilities, and involvement in secondary educator inservice and preservice biotechnological training.

(6) The California State University conducted a Bioscience Innovation and Training Center Feasibility Study to assess the feasibility of creating a multiuse technology innovation and training center in Pasadena that can serve as an anchor and catalyst for biotechnology enterprise growth in the Los Angeles region.

(7) The study was completed in December 2000, and concluded that there is strong demand for biotechnology workforce training, research, manufacturing, and incubation services that warrant the development of a bioscience in Pasadena. When Pasadena was evaluated against critical success factors for biotechnology community development, it scored highly on many factors, including a critical mass of cutting-edge research, accessibility to transportation, quality of life, experienced entrepreneurs, access to capital, and availability of a skilled workforce. The steering committee identified four main components for the proposed facility:

(A) Workforce training offering practical, hands-on learning experiences involving multidisciplinary, multilevel teams of researchers, technicians, production specialists, apprentices, and students.

(B) Core research laboratories and instrument beta testing coupled with process manufacturing.

(C) New business incubator space, including wet labs and shared entrepreneurial services and support.

(D) Bioinformatics (convergence of biology, mathematics, and computing) as a common theme running throughout the center.

(8) The Bioscience Innovation and Training Center Feasibility Study, conducted by the California State University, found that the development of a bioscience center in Pasadena is warranted.

(9) A successful biotechnology resource facility requires a partnership of the city, industry, and education partners, as well as public and private collaboration, in order to develop projects that leverage economic opportunities in the Los Angeles basin and support business throughout California.

(10) It is critical that, for a successful resource facility, the public and private sectors work together to achieve the following components: workforce training, research in core research laboratories, new business incubator space, and manufacturing.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature to accomplish both of the following:

(1) To provide additional state funding, if state revenues allow, to the California State University to maintain the California State University Program for Education and Research in Biotechnology at a level that will maintain and enhance its role in the preparation of the workforce in this critical industry.

(2) To provide additional state funding to the California State University for development of a bioscience center in Pasadena, subject to appropriation in the annual Budget Act, that would integrate research and innovation, applied workforce training, and incubation of new bioscience enterprise. The development of the bioscience center would include a partnership among local educational institutions, the local bioscience industry, and government. These funds shall be used for the development of a pilot bioinnovation workforce training program that bridges the gap between classroom instruction and workforce practice, using state-of-the-art instrumentation and real-world development projects, and for final site assessment to ensure due diligence prior to the selection of a final site.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 225, Sec. 9.   Effective August 16, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4.8. California State University, Stanislaus:  Reuse of Stockton Development Center [89450. - 89452.]

89450.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) There is a need for the California State University to continue development of a reuse plan for the site of the former Stockton Development Center, the property of which has been conveyed to the trustees for public school purposes.

(b) The establishment of an educationally focused campus consisting of public-public and public-private partnerships will result in greater educational opportunities for the residents of San Joaquin County and in economic development opportunities for the City of Stockton.

(c) To facilitate the reuse of the site, it is necessary to provide funding for the maintenance of physical facilities on the site and for a study to explore the long-term feasibility of reusing the site in the prescribed manner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 1020, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

89451.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the Stockton Development Center be a productive asset focused on educationally based programs. Further, it is the intent of the Legislature to supplement state resources in site maintenance through public-public and public-private partnerships.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 1020, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

89452.

(a) The trustees, the Department of General Services, the Department of Finance, and the City of Stockton shall prepare a long-term feasibility study regarding the reuse of the site. The study shall include consideration of the state resources necessary to develop the site in the future. The study shall be completed by September 1, 2000.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 1020, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4.9. California State University Agricultural Research Institute Grant Program [89455. - 89455.]

89455.

(a) (1) The Agricultural Biosecurity Fund is hereby created within the State Treasury. Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, all moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated to the California State University Agricultural Research Institute for allocation without regard to fiscal year for purposes of supporting research on biosecurity related to agriculture, and establishing best practices to mitigate the introduction and effects of infectious agents upon the animal and plant agricultural system of California.

(2) The Agricultural Biosecurity Fund may receive funds from federal, state, local, and private sources.

(b) The California State University Agricultural Research Institute shall administer a grant program with moneys received in the Agricultural Biosecurity Fund for research on biosecurity related to agriculture, and establishing best practices to mitigate the introduction and effects of infectious agents upon the animal and plant agricultural system of California.

(1) All research grants shall be awarded to campuses of the California State University associated with the California State University Agricultural Research Institute, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(A) California Polytechnic State University, San Luis
 Obispo.

(B) California State Polytechnic University, Pomona.

(C) California State University, Chico.

(D) California State University, Fresno.

(E) California State University, Humboldt.

(F) California State University, Monterey Bay.

(2) All research grants shall be awarded on the basis of scientific merit as determined by an open, competitive peer review process that ensures objectivity, consistency, and high quality. All qualified investigators affiliated with one of the campuses of the California State University listed in paragraph (1)
 shall have equal access and opportunity to compete for the grant funds.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 386, Sec. 1.   (SB 453)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Personnel [89500. - 89574.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [89500. - 89528.]

89500.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the trustees shall provide by rule for the government of their appointees and employees, pursuant to this chapter and other applicable provisions of law, including, but not limited to: appointment; classification; terms; duties; pay and overtime pay; uniform and equipment allowances; travel expenses and allowances; rates for housing and lodging; moving expenses; leave of absence; tenure; vacation; holidays; layoff; dismissal; demotion; suspension; sick leave; reinstatement; and employer’s contribution to employees’, annuitants’, and survivors’ health benefits plans.

(2) The rules adopted by the trustees relating to tenure, layoff, dismissal, demotion, suspension, and reinstatement of academic and administrative employees shall be adopted on or before February 1, 1962, and become effective on July 1, 1962, with respect to employees who are academic teaching and administrative employees as defined in subdivision (1)(e) of Section 24301, as it read on June 30, 1961, as enacted by Chapter 2 of the Statutes of 1959.

(b) The adoption of these rules and regulations shall not be subject to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(c) If the provisions of this section are in conflict with the provisions of a memorandum of understanding reached pursuant to Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 3560) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code, the memorandum of understanding shall be controlling without further legislative action, except that if the provisions of a memorandum of understanding require the expenditure of funds, the provisions shall not become effective unless approved by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 938, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

89500.7.

(a) The trustees shall offer, on at least a semiannual basis, to each of the university’s filers, an orientation course on the relevant ethics statutes and regulations that govern the official conduct of university officials.

(b) As used in this section, “filer” means each member, officer, or designated employee of the California State University, including a trustee, who, because of his or her affiliation with the university or any subdivision or campus thereof, is required to file a Statement of Economic Interests in accordance with Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 87100) of Title 9 of the Government Code.

(c) The
 trustees shall maintain records indicating the specific attendees, each attendee’s job title, and dates of their attendance for each orientation course offered pursuant to this section. These records shall be maintained for a period of at least five years after each course is offered. These records shall be public records subject to inspection and copying in accordance with Section 81008 of the Government Code and any other public records disclosure laws that are applicable to the university.

(d) Except as provided in subdivision (e), each filer shall attend the orientation course established pursuant to subdivision (a) in accordance with both of the following:

(1) For a person who, as of January 1, 2005, is a filer, as defined in subdivision (b), not later than December 31, 2005, and thereafter, at least once during each consecutive period of two calendar years commencing on
 January 1, 2007.

(2) For a person who becomes a filer, as defined in subdivision (b), after January 1, 2005, within six months after he or she becomes a filer, and at least once during each consecutive period of two calendar years commencing on January 1 of the first odd-numbered year thereafter.

(e) The requirements of subdivision (d) do not apply to a filer, as defined in subdivision (b), who has taken an ethics orientation course through another state agency or the Legislature within the periods set forth in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (d) if, in the determination of the trustees, that course covered substantially the same material as the course the university would offer to the filer pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 136.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

89501.

(a) For the purpose of facilitating the recruitment of professional and technically trained persons to fill positions for which there is a shortage of qualified applicants, the trustees may authorize payment of all or a part of the travel expense of applicants who are called for interview and all or a part of the travel and moving expense of persons who change their place of residence to accept employment with the state. These payments shall be made only upon the certification of the trustees that the expenditure is necessary in order to recruit qualified persons needed by the California State University.

If, for reasons that do not meet the approval of the trustees, the employee or applicant for employment does not accept or continue the employment for a period of two years, he or she shall reimburse the trustees for the moving and travel expenses for the full or proportionate amount.

For the purposes of this section, satisfactory reasons for not completing two years of employment shall be death, prolonged illness, disability, unacceptability of the applicant or employee to the trustees, and similar eventualities beyond the control of the applicant or employee.

(b) If the provisions of this section are in conflict with the provisions of a memorandum of understanding reached pursuant to Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 3560) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code, the memorandum of understanding shall be controlling without further legislative action, except that if the provisions of a memorandum of understanding require the expenditure of funds, the provisions shall not become effective unless approved by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1040, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

89502.

(a) It is the policy of the state that the workweek of the employees of the California State University shall be 40 hours, and the workday of such employees eight hours, except that workweeks and workdays of a different number of hours may be established in order to meet the varying needs of the different campuses and facilities. It is the policy of the state to avoid the necessity for overtime work whenever possible.

This policy does not restrict the extension of regular working-hour schedules on an overtime basis when the action is necessary to carry on the business of the California State University properly during a manpower shortage.

The trustees may provide for the payment of overtime in designated classes for work performed after the normal scheduled workday or normal scheduled workweek, when the designation is appropriate to the designated class.

(b) If the provisions of this section are in conflict with the provisions of a memorandum of understanding reached pursuant to Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 3560) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code, the memorandum of understanding shall be controlling without further legislative action, except that if the provisions of a memorandum of understanding require the expenditure of funds, the provisions shall not become effective unless approved by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 143, Sec. 124.)
-------------------------------------------

89503.

(a) The trustees may authorize payments into a private fund to provide health and welfare benefits to nonpermanent employees of the class specified in Section 19830 of the Government Code employed by the trustees, upon a finding by the trustees as to any position that the criteria stated in subdivision (a) of Section 19831 of the Government Code are satisfied.

(b) Payments made by the state pursuant to this section to any fund on behalf of any employees shall be in lieu of benefits such as vacation allowance, sick leave, and retirement that may be granted directly by the state in accordance with law.

(c) The trustees may determine the equitable application of this section to ensure that the employees receive benefits comparable to, but not in excess of, those provided in comparable private employment.

(d) The payments authorized by this section shall be a proper charge against any funds available for the support of the California State University.

(e) If the provisions of this section are in conflict with the provisions of a memorandum of understanding reached pursuant to Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 3560) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code, the memorandum of understanding shall be controlling without further legislative action, except that, if the provisions of a memorandum of understanding require the expenditure of funds, the provisions shall not become effective unless approved by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 141.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

89504.

(a) Upon separation from service without fault on his or her part, an employee is entitled to a lump-sum payment as of the time of separation for any unused or accumulated vacation or for any time off to which the employee is entitled by reason of previous overtime work where compensating time off for overtime work is provided for by the trustees. This sum shall be computed by projecting the accumulated time on a calendar basis so that the lump sum will equal the amount which the employee would have been paid had the employee taken the time off but not separated from the service.

(b) Employees separated from service through fault of their own are entitled to a lump-sum payment for compensating time off for overtime work, and in addition, the portion, if any, of unused vacation as the trustees may determine. The computation of this sum shall be based on actual accumulated time without projection as provided in subdivision (a).

(c) Lump-sum payment for vacation shall not be made to a person who separates from a position for the purpose of accepting another position in the state service, except either of the following:

(1) Upon movement to a position in which vacation credits are neither accrued nor used.

(2) Upon reassignment of an employee, subsequent to January 1, 1965, from a position other than an academic year position, to an academic year position.

However, a lump-sum payment shall not be made to a person who returns to a position in the same class within 15 working days of the date of the person’s resignation.

(d) Except for payment authorized or excluded under subdivision (c), an employee who returns to state service during the period through which his or her lump-sum payment was computed may refund the amount of lump-sum payment which exceeds his or her break in service and have the balance of credits restored as though he or she had remained in state service and taken the time off.

(e) If subdivisions (a) to (d), inclusive, are in conflict with the provisions of a memorandum of understanding reached pursuant to Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 3560) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code, the memorandum of understanding shall be controlling without further legislative action, except that if the provisions of a memorandum of understanding require the expenditure of funds, the provisions shall not become effective unless approved by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act.

(f) Notwithstanding other provisions of this section, the trustees may provide for lump-sum payment for vacation for nonrepresented employees of the California State University.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 227, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

89505.

The trustees, subject to such conditions as they may establish, may purchase annuity contracts for any of their employees, and shall reduce the salary of any such employee for whom such contract is purchased in the amount of the cost thereof; provided that each of the following conditions are met:

(a) The annuity contract is under an annuity plan which meets the requirements of Section 403(b) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954 of the United States as amended by the Employment Retirement Income Security Act of 1974 (P.L. 93-406). 

(b) The employee makes application to the trustees for such purchase and reduction of salary.

(c) All provisions of the Insurance Code applicable to the purchase of such annuities are satisfied.

If the provisions of this section are in conflict with the provisions of a memorandum of understanding reached pursuant to Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 3560) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code, the memorandum of understanding shall be controlling without further legislative action, except that if such provisions of a memorandum of understanding require the expenditure of funds, the provisions shall not become effective unless approved by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1072.)
-------------------------------------------

89505.5.

(a) Officers and employees of the California State University may participate in the deferred compensation plan established pursuant to Section 19993 of the Government Code upon compliance with the statutory prerequisites for participation in the plan.

(b) If the provisions of this section are in conflict with the provisions of a memorandum of understanding reached pursuant to Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 3560) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code, the memorandum of understanding shall be controlling without further legislative action, except that if the provisions of a memorandum of understanding require the expenditure of funds, the provisions shall not become effective unless approved by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1040, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

89506.

(a) The trustees, subject to such conditions as they may establish, may enter into contracts of group life insurance and contracts of group disability insurance or protection with respect to any class of their employees they may designate or with respect to all such employees, with any insurer, medical service plan, or nonprofit hospital service plan corporation they may select; provided, that all applicable provisions of state law relating to any such coverage, or to the qualifications of the provider of coverage, are satisfied.

(b) If the provisions of this section are in conflict with the provisions of a memorandum of understanding reached pursuant to Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 3560) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code, the memorandum of understanding shall be controlling without further legislative action, except that if such provisions of a memorandum of understanding require the expenditure of funds, the provisions shall not become effective unless approved by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1072.)
-------------------------------------------

89507.

(a) The trustees, subject to any conditions which the trustees may impose, may establish programs of insurance with respect to any class of employees of the trustees which the trustees may designate or with respect to all of the employees of the trustees, with any insurer or insurers, insurance broker or brokers, or insurance agent or agents, the trustees may select, provided that all applicable provisions of the Insurance Code relating to the insurance, or to the qualifications of the insurer, broker, or agent, are satisfied. The premiums of the programs of insurance shall be borne by the employees, employer, or employees and employer participating therein.

(b) If the provisions of this section are in conflict with the provisions of a memorandum of understanding reached pursuant to Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 3560) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code, the memorandum of understanding shall be controlling without further legislative action, except that if the provisions of a memorandum of understanding require the expenditure of funds, the provisions shall not become effective unless approved by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1054, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

89508.

(a) Each person holding a four-year term appointment under Section 80507 on June 30, 1961, regardless of when the term commenced, shall on that date be entitled to all personnel benefits and rights under the law which would have attached to the person’s position if he or she had been appointed and had served throughout his or her state university employment under the provisions of law applicable to persons serving under appointments made pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 89530).

On and after July 1, 1961, the person shall be entitled to all personnel benefits and rights conferred by Section 66609 upon state employees appointed pursuant to Article 2 and transferred to the Trustees of the California State University by that section.

(b) If the provisions of this section are in conflict with the provisions of a memorandum of understanding reached pursuant to Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 3560) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code, the memorandum of understanding shall be controlling without further legislative action, except that if the provisions of a memorandum of understanding require the expenditure of funds, the provisions shall not become effective unless approved by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 143, Sec. 126.)
-------------------------------------------

89510.

(a) The trustees may grant a leave of absence without compensation to any nonacademic employee.

(b) If the provisions of this section are in conflict with the provisions of a memorandum of understanding reached pursuant to Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 3560) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code, the memorandum of understanding shall be controlling without further legislative action, except that if such provisions of a memorandum of understanding require the expenditure of funds, the provisions shall not become effective unless approved by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1072.)
-------------------------------------------

89511.

(a) (1) The California State University shall grant to any employee, upon a request that provides at least 30 days notice before commencement, a leave of absence without loss of compensation for the purpose of enabling the employee to serve as an elected officer of any California State University campus public employee organization or any statewide or national public employee organization with which the university campus organization is affiliated.

(2) When possible, the employee shall provide the request described in paragraph (1) at least 30 days before the start of the academic term during which the leave will occur.

(b) The leave shall include, but is not limited to, absence for purposes of attendance by the employee at periodic, stated, special, or regular meetings of the body of the organization on which the employee serves as an officer. Compensation during the leave shall include retirement fund contributions required of the university or a campus of the university as employer. Required retirement contributions shall include the amount necessary to pay any unfunded liability cost for the retirement plan. The employee shall earn full service credit during the leave of absence and shall pay member contributions as prescribed by Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 20671) of Part 3 of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code. The maximum amount of the service credit earned shall not exceed 12 calendar years. Any employee who serves as a full-time
 officer of a public employee organization shall not be eligible for disability benefits under the Public Employees’ Retirement System while on the leave of absence.

(c) Following the university’s or campus of the university’s payment of the employee for the leave of absence, the university or campus of the university shall be reimbursed by the employee organization of which the employee is an elected officer for all compensation paid the employee on account of the leave. Reimbursement by the employee organization shall be made within 10 days after its receipt of the certification of payment of compensation to the employee.

(d) The leave of absence without loss of compensation provided for by this section is in addition to the released time without loss of compensation granted to
 representatives of an exclusive representative by Section 3569 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 569, Sec. 1.   (AB 2294)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

89512.

(a) Upon the expiration of the leave of absence granted pursuant to Section 89510 or 89511, the employee to whom the leave of absence was granted is entitled to reinstatement in the position the employee held at the time the leave of absence was granted, if the position is still in
 existence, or to any other comparable existing vacant position for which the employee is qualified.

(b) If the provisions of this section are in conflict with the provisions of a memorandum of understanding reached pursuant to Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 3560) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code, the memorandum of understanding shall be controlling without further legislative action, except that if provisions of a memorandum of understanding require the expenditure of funds, the provisions shall not become effective unless approved by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 569, Sec. 2.   (AB 2294)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

89513.

(a) Every employee who has entered or who hereafter enters the active military service of the United States of America or of the State of California, including active service in any uniformed auxiliary of, or to, any branch of such military service created or authorized as such auxiliary by the Congress of the United States of America or by the Legislature of the State of California, or in the full-time paid service of the American Red Cross, during any period of national emergency declared by the President of the United States of America or during any war in which the United States of America is engaged, shall be deemed to have been entitled or shall be entitled to absent himself from his duties.

Within six months after such employee honorably leaves such service or has been placed on inactive duty he shall be entitled to return to the position held by him at the time of his entrance into such military service, at the salary to which he would have been entitled had he not absented himself from his duties.

(b) If the provisions of this section are in conflict with the provisions of a memorandum of understanding reached pursuant to Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 3560) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code, the memorandum of understanding shall be controlling without further legislative action, except that if such provisions of a memorandum of understanding require the expenditure of funds, the provisions shall not become effective unless approved by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1072.)
-------------------------------------------

89514.

(a) The time during which an employee of the trustees is on leave of absence without compensation shall not be credited toward retirement under any retirement system of the state. If such employee receives compensation during such leave of absence the time for which he receives such compensation shall be credited toward retirement. The period of any leave of absence shall not be construed as a break in the continuity of service required toward retirement.

(b) If the provisions of this section are in conflict with the provisions of a memorandum of understanding reached pursuant to Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 3560) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code, the memorandum of understanding shall be controlling without further legislative action, except that if such provisions of a memorandum of understanding require the expenditure of funds, the provisions shall not become effective unless approved by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1072.)
-------------------------------------------

89515.

The trustees shall eliminate all policies which detrimentally and unreasonably affect the employment status of females hired by the California State University. To accomplish this purpose, the trustees shall do all of the following:

(a) Review hiring, wages, job classifications, and advancement practices as applied to female employees and take corrective measures where inequities exist. 

(b) Review selection procedures utilized for employment of female employees to determine disparate selection practices.

(c) Assure opportunity of advancement for qualified female employees to executive positions within departments and divisions.

If the provisions of this section are in conflict with the provisions of a memorandum of understanding reached pursuant to Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 3560) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code, the memorandum of understanding shall be controlling without further legislative action, except that if the provisions of a memorandum of understanding require the expenditure of funds, the provisions shall not become effective unless approved by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 143, Sec. 127.)
-------------------------------------------

89516.

The trustees may establish rules and regulations which allow academic teaching employees, librarians, counselors, and student affairs officers to reduce their workload from full-time to part-time duties.

Such regulations shall include but shall not be limited to the following if such employees wish to reduce their workload and maintain retirement benefits pursuant to Section 20815 of the Government Code:

(a) The employee must have reached the age of 55 prior to reduction in workload.

(b) The employee must have been employed full-time as an academic employee for at least 10 years of which the immediately preceding five years were full-time employment. For purposes of this subdivision, sabbatical and other approved leaves shall not constitute a break in service. However, time spent on sabbatical or on other approved leaves shall not be used in satisfying the five-year full-time employment requirement.
